Hawaii, session 2026, GM1302.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the State has
accumulated an estimated $470,000,000 in unspent temporary
assistance for needy families program funding with approximately
$333,000,000 in encumbrances on that funding. These moneys are
S required to be spent on needy families that meet the eligibility
requirements of the temporary assistance for needy families
program.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the
office of wellness and resilience, in consultation with the
department of human services, to develop a comprehensive plan
for the establishment of a kakou pilot program to support
families and children in need.
SECTION 2. (a) The office of wellness and resilience, in
consultation with the department of human services, shall
develop a comprehensive plan for the establishment of a kakou
pilot program to support families and children in need.
2026-2559 SB2861 CDl SMA-l.docx
llllinilllllllBlflllMllllltlllllUI

Page 2 2861
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
(b) For the purposes of the kakou pilot program, the
office of wellness and resilience shall create a plan to:
(1) Provide services for children in need, including child
wellness visits;
(2) Distribute food boxes to eligible families, as needed;
(3) Provide counseling and related support services to
eligible families with a focus on families exiting a
foster family placement and other at-risk children as
determined by the plan;
(4) Administer trauma-informed care services to eligible
families and children at risk of neglect; and
(5) Provide any other related services to support families
and children in need in accordance with this Act.
(c) The office of wellness and resilience may adopt
policies and procedures necessary to develop the plan for the
kakou pilot program and to carry out the purposes of this Act.
(d) The office of wellness and resilience shall:
(1) Submit a preliminary report of its comprehensive plan
to develop the kakou pilot program, including any
proposed legislation, a recommended implementation
structure identifying the administering agency or
2026-2559 SB2861 GDI SMA-l.docx
llinilNHIIIHHIlH

Page 3
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
agencies, and recommendations on whether the pilot
program should be established, to the legislature no
later than twenty days prior to the convening of the
regular session of 2027; and
(2) Submit a final report of its plan to the legislature
no later than June 30, 2027.
(e) The planning period for the kakou pilot program shall
expire on June 30, 2027.
(f) For the purposes of this Act, "eligible families"
means families who meet eligibility criteria for the temporary
assistance for needy families program, as determined by the
department of human services, or any other families meeting
standards and requirements recommended by the office of wellness
and resilience in its comprehensive plan and approved by the
administering agency or agencies; provided that such standards
shall comply with applicable federal requirements.
SECTION 3. Beginning July 1, 2028, the department of human
services, pursuant to section 2(d), is authorized and may expend
temporary assistance for needy families funds for the purposes
of the kakou pilot program, including $130,000 per year for an
external evaluator to conduct data collection and to assess
2026-2559 SB2861 CDl SMA-l.docx
liiHlinillllHIilMill

Page 4
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
whether the pilot program meets at least one of the purposes of
the temporary assistance for needy families program and whether
the pilot program effectively addresses that purpose.
SECTION 4. If any part of this Act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed
condition for the allocation of federal funds to the State, the
conflicting part of this Act shall be inoperative solely to the
extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly
affected, and this finding shall not affect the operation of the
remainder of this Act in its application to the agencies
concerned.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2559 SB2861 CDl SMA-l.docx
■■IIIIIIHIIilHlIiilllHIII

S.B. NO. --
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 7th day of July , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 2861, S.D. 2, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
199-26

SB No. 2861, SD 2, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K.. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives